Utah statutes.
77-23a-14.   Court order for installation -- Application.

(1)  The attorney general, a deputy attorney general, a county attorney or district attorney, a deputy county attorney or deputy district attorney, or a prosecuting attorney for a political subdivision of the state, or a law enforcement officer, may make application for an order or extension of an order under Section 77-23a-15 authorizing or approving the installation and use of a pen register or trap and trace device, in writing and under oath or equivalent affirmation, to a court of competent jurisdiction.

(2)  An application under Subsection (1) shall include:

(a)  the identity of the attorney for the government or the law enforcement or investigative officer making the application and the identity of the law enforcement agency conducting the investigation; and

(b)  a certification by the applicant that the information likely to be obtained is relevant to an ongoing criminal investigation being conducted by that agency.

